tools/suffixes/nouns/nSubs.lexc
!Copyright (C) 2019 Hélio L. B. Silva
!Distributed under the terms of the GNU General Public License Version 3

Multichar_Symbols +N +F +SG +PL

LEXICON Root
<@txt"nSubs.lemas">	Substantivo;

LEXICON Substantivo
+N:0 Gênero;

LEXICON Gênero
+F:0 Número;

LEXICON Número
+SG:0 #;
+PL:s #;
